Washington statutes.
RCW 26.33.260

Decree of adoption—Effect—Accelerated appeal—Limited grounds to challenge—Intent.

(1) The entry of a decree of adoption divests any parent or *alleged father who is not married to the adoptive parent or who has not joined in the petition for adoption of all legal rights and obligations in respect to the adoptee, except past-due child support obligations. The adoptee shall be free from all legal obligations of obedience and maintenance in respect to the parent. The adoptee shall be, to all intents and purposes, and for all legal incidents, the child, legal heir, and lawful issue of the adoptive parent, entitled to all rights and privileges, including the right of inheritance and the right to take under testamentary disposition, and subject to all the obligations of a natural child of the adoptive parent.

(2) Any appeal of an adoption decree shall be decided on an accelerated review basis.

(3) Except as otherwise provided in RCW 26.33.160 (3) and (4)(h), no person may challenge an adoption decree on the grounds of:

(a) A person claiming or alleging paternity subsequently appears and alleges lack of prior notice of the proceeding; or

(b) The adoption proceedings were in any other manner defective.

(4) It is the intent of the legislature that this section provide finality for adoptive placements and stable homes for children.

[ 1995 c 270 s 7; 1984 c 155 s 26.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 26.33.020 was amended by 2019 c 46 s 5034, changing the definition of "alleged father" to "alleged genetic parent."

Finding—1995 c 270: See note following RCW 74.13A.040.

Inheritance by adopted child: RCW 11.04.085.